src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;

! LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-ani
! +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
!
! LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;

!LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-plcorg
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;

! LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-malfem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
!
! LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-femsur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: PN_I_FINSK_FLAG ;


! not in use
! LEXICON PN_IE_plcorg ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
! +Sg: N_IE_SG ;
! :ie                  RHyph ;
! !+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
! :    N_IE_ESS ;
! +Attr:ie FINAL1 ;

!LEXICON PN_I_FINSK_PLC-ORG ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
!+Sg: PN_I_FINSK ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i%>n                      RHyph ;
!!+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
!!:    N_IE_ESS ;
!+Attr:i FINAL1 ;


!LEXICON MEHKIE ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:ie%>               FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:ie%>n                      RHyph ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:ie%>m               FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:ie%>n               FINAL1 ;
!! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:%>an                FINAL1 ; !SUB - is this possible? IllSg without Uml in -ie?
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan      FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne              FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste              FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine               FINAL1 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com+Uml:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: N_IE_PL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:    N_IE_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:ie%>n FINAL1 ;


! Even syllable Sámi names:
LEXICON PN_IE_PLUR ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
 @U.Cap.Obl@ PN_IE_PLUR_INFL;
LEXICON PN_IE_PLUR_INFL ! as N_IE, but with Prop tag
         +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl:          N_IE_PL  ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:ie%>j     RHyph    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgGen:ie%>j     RHyph    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Uml+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:%>%^iUMLi RHyph    ;
            +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:          N_IE_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:ie%>h FINAL1 ;


! LEXICON PN_OE_UML ! as N_OE_UML, but with Prop tag ! (still) not in use
!  +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: N_OE_SGILL_UML_PLC-ORG ;
!           PN_OE ;

LEXICON PN_OE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PN_OE ;

LEXICON PN_OE_PL-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: PN_OE_PL ;

LEXICON PN_OE-Mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PN_OE ;

LEXICON PN_OE ! as N_OE, but with Prop tag
 @U.Cap.Obl@ PN_OE_INFL ;

LEXICON PN_OE_PL ! 
 @U.Cap.Obl@ PN_OE_INFL_PL ;

LEXICON PN_OE_INFL_PL ! 
 +Pl:   N_OE_PL  ;


LEXICON PN_OE_INFL
    +Sg+Nom:oe FINAL1           ;
 +Sg+Use/NG:   N_OE_SGILL_UML   ; ! Causes Umlaut
        +Sg:   N_OE_SGILL_NOUML ; ! 
           :   N_OE_NO_ILL      ; ! gives the other cases
   +Cmp/SgNom:oe RHyph    ; ! RHyph = Cmp-lexicon
   +Cmp/SgGen:oe RHyph    ; ! RHyph = Cmp-lexicon
        +Pl:   N_OE_PL  ;
               N_OE_ESS ;
      +Attr:oe FINAL1   ;

!LEXICON PN_OE_PLC-ORG ! as N_OE, but with Prop tag
!   +Sg:   N_OE_SG  ;
!   +Cmp/SgNom:oe RHyph    ; ! RHyph = Cmp-lexicon
!   +Cmp/SgGen:oe RHyph    ; ! RHyph = Cmp-lexicon
! !+Pl: N_OE_PL ;
!          N_OE_ESS ;
! +Attr:oe FINAL1   ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: PERS_SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PERS_SNAME_MAANA ;

!LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA-ani
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: PERS_SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PERS_SNAME_MAANA ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_MAANA
                         SNAME_MAANA_FLAG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:@U.Cap.Obl@e%»tj GÅATETJE    ; !Åvletje

!LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-fem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: SNAME_MAANA_FLAG ;

!LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-sur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: SNAME_MAANA_FLAG ;

!LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-mal
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: SNAME_MAANA_FLAG ;

!LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-ani
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: SNAME_MAANA_FLAG ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-org
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org: SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: SNAME_MAANA_FLAG ;

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_MAANA ;
LEXICON SNAME_MAANA ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
     +Sg:       MAANASGNOM ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%>m   FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%>n   FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se  FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1     ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:a      RHyph      ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a      RHyph      ;
     +Pl:       MAANA_PL   ;
                EVEN_ESS   ;
   +Attr:a      FINAL1     ;


LEXICON SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG ;
LEXICON SNAME_MAANA_PLC-ORG ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
     +Sg:       MAANASGNOM ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%>m   FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%>n   FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se  FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1     ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1     ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:a      RHyph      ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a      RHyph      ;
!+Pl: MAANA_PL ;
                EVEN_ESS   ;
   +Attr:a      FINAL1     ;
   
   

LEXICON SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:a         FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>edh     FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>se     FINAL1   ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:a%>m      FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1   ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>emem    FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>emdh    FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>mse    FINAL1   ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:a%>n      FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>ene     FINAL1   ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se     FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>asanne  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>asadth  FINAL1   ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1   ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>astanne FINAL1   ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>astadth FINAL1   ;
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine     FINAL1   ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>anadth  FINAL1   ;
                             +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:a         RHyph    ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: MAANA_PL ;
                             +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:          EVEN_ESS ;
                        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:a         FINAL1   ;


LEXICON SNAME_MAANA_PLUR ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
@U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_MAANA_PLUR_INFL ;
LEXICON SNAME_MAANA_PLUR_INFL ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl:     MAANA_PL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/PlGen:a%>j RHyph    ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:     EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:a%>h FINAL1 ;



LEXICON JÆLLAN ! as MAANA, but with Prop tag
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JÆLLAN_FLAG ;
LEXICON JÆLLAN_FLAG
@U.Cap.Obl@ JÆLLAN_INFL ;
LEXICON JÆLLAN_INFL
 +Sg+Nom:a%>n   FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%>m   FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%>n   FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se  FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1   ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1   ;
!    +Pl:       MAANA_PL ;
                EVEN_ESS ;
   +Attr:a%>n   FINAL1   ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:a%>n   RHyph    ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a%>n   RHyph    ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE ;
LEXICON PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE
                        SNAME_NIEJTE ;
+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE ; !Åvletje

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;
