src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Ahah:Ah SNAME_MAANA_PLUR "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Annka:Annk PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Assyria:Assyri SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Baektien-Laara:Baektien-Laar PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Boiotia:Bo^ioti SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
Bovtsetjahke:Bovtse^tjahk SNAME_NIEJTE-plc ; 
Brage:Brag SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ; 
Brasília:Brasíli SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Bræjhta:Bræjht PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Brïjhte:Brïjht PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Båvloenvaartoe:Båvloen^vaart PN_OE-plc ; 
Catoe:Cato PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Da+N+Prop+CmpN/None:D SNAME_MAANA ; 
Dåaranjaevrieh:Dåaran^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR "62 VATTDRTX" ;
Dåeriesjællan:Dåeries^jæll JÆLLAN ;
Ealla:Eall PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Eallanjohke:Eallan^johk SNAME_NIEJTE-plc ; 
Eebre:Eebr PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Eelle:Eell PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Erve:Erv SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ; 
Euboia:Eubo^i SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
Freavnan:Freavn JÆLLAN ;
Gaalloevaartoe:Gaalloe^vaart PN_OE-plc "25 TERRTX" ;
Gaarme:Gaarm SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;!´kraftig´
Garsbåvne:Gars^båvn SNAME_NIEJTE-plc ; 
Gazastripa:Gaza^strip SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Goehpevaajjan:Goehpe^vaajj JÆLLAN ;
Golmesjaevrieh:Golmes^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR ;
Guarhtavaartoe:Guarhta^vaart PN_OE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Guhkiesnïese:Guhkies^nïes SNAME_NIEJTE-plc "13 TERRTX" ;
Gullhååge:Gullhååg SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;
Gunne:Gunn PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Gåsta:Gåst PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Helge:Helg SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ; 
Heskja:Heskj SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
Hilje:Hilj PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Ingke:Ingk PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Jeense:Jeens PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Jense:Jens PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Jesse:Jess SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ; 
Jillievaartoe:Jillie^vaart PN_OE-plc "13 TERRTX" ;
Jåhha:Jåhh PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Jåvva:Jåvv PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Klaasejaevrieh:Klaase^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR "26 VATTDRTX" ;
Kleahpah:Kleahp SNAME_MAANA_PLUR "61 TERRTX" ;
Kleamma:Kleamm PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Kleppa:Klepp SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
Krïhke:Krïhk PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Kyrre:Kyrr SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ; 
Laajla:Laajl PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Laara:Laar PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Leeningrade:Leenin^grad SNAME_NIEJTE-plc ;
Lilleasia:Lille^asi SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Læspa:Læsp PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Löövra:Löövr PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Maarja:Maarj PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Meehte:Meeht PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Meerhke:Meerhk PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Metha:Meth SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
Möörhte:Möörht PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;
Naahte:Naaht SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;!´Støtte´
Nadave:Nadav SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Njallevaartoe:Njalle^vaart PN_OE-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Njuanajaevrieh:Njuana^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR "25 VATTDRTX" ;
Nord-Ossetia:Nord-Osseti SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Ohtjejællanjohke:Ohtje^jællan^johk SNAME_NIEJTE-plc ; 
Piere:Pier PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Polstjerna:Pol^stjern SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Pravka:Pravk SNAME_MAANA-plc "26 TERRTX" ;
Raahkele-Piere:Raahkele-Pier PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ;
Rakele+Use/Sub:Rakel PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Rapmerejaevrieh:Rapmere^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Rapsenvaartoe:Rapsen^vaart PN_OE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Ruffe:Ruff SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;!lurvete
Saajve-Biehtere:Saajve-Biehter PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;
Saanne-Maarja:Saanne-Maarj PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Sagka:Sagk PERS_SNAME_MAANA-fem ;
Sapadnaja+N+Prop:Sapadnaj SNAME_MAANA ;
Severnaja+N+Prop:Severnaj SNAME_MAANA ;
Sijlistjahke:Sijlis^tjahk SNAME_NIEJTE-plc ; 
Sjanne:Sjann SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ; 
Sjleangajaevrieh:Sjleanga^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR "13 VATTDRTX" ;
Sondre:Sondr SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ; 
Spica:Spic SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
Stoer% Vaartoe:Stoer% Vaart PN_OE-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Sveerte:Sveert SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;!comes from the adjective "sveartoeh"=glupsk
Sööfe:Sööf PERS_SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Sør-Korea:Sør-Kore^ SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Tibpe:Tibp SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ;
Tjaarke:Tjaark SNAME_NIEJTE-ani ; !a dog
Tjeelegjaevrieh:Tjeeleg^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR "13 VATTDRTX" ;
Tjerredahke:Tjerredahk SNAME_NIEJTE-plc "9 TERRTX" ;
Tåamma:Tåamm PERS_SNAME_MAANA-mal ;
Varila:Varil SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
Vuolle:Vuoll SNAME_NIEJTE-mal ; 
Våajmoe:Våajm PN_OE-plc "62 VATTTX" ;
Zapadnaja+N+Prop:Zapadnaj SNAME_MAANA ;
Åarjel-Afrika:Åarjel-Afrik SNAME_MAANA-LOAN ;
Volgjaevrieh:Volg^jaevr PN_IE_PLUR ;
